Utah statutes.
59-1-201.   Composition of commission -- Terms.
The commission shall be composed of four members appointed by the governor
with the consent of the Senate.  No more than two members may belong to the
same political party.  The term of office of each commissioner shall be for
four years and expire on June 30 of the year the term ends.  Terms shall be
staggered so that the term of one commissioner expires each year.  Each
commissioner shall hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified.
Any commissioner may, after notice and a hearing, be removed by the governor
for neglect of duty, inefficiency, or malfeasance.  Any replacement shall
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.  Any members otherwise
qualified shall be eligible for reappointment.
